Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 201677-6301
Act, how cited.

Sections
77-6301 to 77-6310 shall be known and may be cited as the Angel Investment
Tax Credit Act.

Laws 2011, LB389, § 1;

Laws 2014, LB836, § 6.